Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Chapter 6 Public-Private Transportation Act
54-6-110. Comprehensive agreement prior to development, redevelopment, or operation of transportation facility.

Prior to developing, redeveloping, or operating the qualifying transportation facility, the eligible private entity shall enter into a comprehensive agreement with the responsible public entity. The comprehensive agreement shall provide for:

Delivery of performance and payment bonds that comply with § 54-5-119(a) or letters of credit in connection with any development or redevelopment of the qualifying transportation facility, and bonds, letters of credit, or other forms of security for any operation of the qualifying transportation facility, in the forms and amounts satisfactory to the responsible public entity;

Review of plans for the development, redevelopment, and operation of the qualifying transportation facility by the responsible public entity and approval by the responsible public entity if the plans conform to the standards of the responsible public entity;

Inspection of development, redevelopment, or operation of the qualifying transportation facility by the responsible public entity to ensure that the development, redevelopment, or operation conforms to the engineering and other standards acceptable to the responsible public entity;

Maintenance by the private entity of a policy or policies of public liability insurance of which copies shall be filed with the responsible public entity accompanied by proofs of coverage, or self-insurance, in such form and amount satisfactory to the responsible public entity and reasonably sufficient to insure coverage of tort liability to the public and employees and to enable the continued operation of the qualifying transportation facility;

Monitoring of the maintenance practices of the private entity by the responsible public entity and the taking of such actions as the responsible public entity finds appropriate to ensure that the qualifying transportation facility is properly maintained;

Filing of appropriate financial statements in a form acceptable to the responsible public entity on a periodic basis;

The date of termination of the private entity's authority and duties under this chapter and dedication to the appropriate public entity;

Any such user fees as may be established by agreement of the parties;

Details on the payment mechanism and performance requirements; and

The duties of the private entity under this chapter.

The comprehensive agreement may contain:

Other terms and conditions that the responsible public entity determines serve the public purpose of this chapter and to which the private entity and the responsible public entity mutually agree, including provisions regarding unavoidable delays or provisions providing for a loan of public funds for the development, redevelopment, or operation of one (1) or more qualifying transportation facilities;

Provisions for the development, redevelopment, or operation of phases or segments of the qualifying transportation facility;

Provisions under which the responsible public entity agrees to provide notice of default and cure rights for the benefit of the private entity and the persons specified in the agreement as providing financing for the qualifying transportation facility;

Reimbursement to be paid to the responsible public entity for its cost to provide the services performed by the responsible public entity;

Guaranteed cost and completion guarantees related to the development, redevelopment, and operation of the qualified transportation facility and payment of damages or election to forgo availability payments for failure to meet the completion guarantee; and

The process for potential sharing or distributing of any earnings in excess of the maximum rate of return as negotiated in the comprehensive agreement.

Any changes in the terms of the comprehensive agreement, as may be agreed upon by the parties, shall be added to the comprehensive agreement by written amendment.

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, a responsible public entity may enter into a comprehensive agreement with multiple private entities if the responsible public entity determines in writing that it serves the public purpose of this chapter to do so.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-111. Contract for development, redevelopment, or operation of transportation facility.

In addition to any authority otherwise conferred by law, any public entity may contract with an eligible private entity for the development, redevelopment, or operation of a qualifying transportation facility in exchange for availability payments and other consideration as such public entity may deem appropriate.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-112.
Dedication of property.

Any public entity may dedicate any property in which it has an interest for public use as a qualified transportation facility if it finds that the dedication would serve the public purpose of this chapter. In connection with the dedication, the public entity may convey any interest that it has in the property, subject to the conditions imposed by general law, to the private entity, subject to this chapter, for such consideration as such public entity may determine. Such consideration may include the agreement of the private entity to develop, redevelop, or operate the qualifying transportation facility.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-113. Powers and duties of private entity.

The eligible private entity shall have all power allowed by law generally to a private entity having the same form of organization as the eligible private entity. The eligible private entity shall have the power to develop, redevelop, and operate the qualifying transportation facility, impose user fees, and enter into service contracts in connection with the development, redevelopment, or operation of the facility in exchange for availability payments and other consideration without further approval by the general assembly; provided, that any state funds used for the purposes of this chapter shall be specifically appropriated by reference in the general appropriations act to the project or services for the qualifying transportation facility; provided, further, that the development, redevelopment, or operation of any project or qualifying transportation facility for which the department is the responsible public entity and for which toll revenue as defined in § 54-3-103 is collected, shall be subject to the requirements of § 54-3-102(b) that the project or facility be included in the department's transportation improvement program submitted to the general assembly and be subject to approval of the general assembly pursuant to the express provisions of the general appropriations act. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the authority to develop, redevelop, and operate transportation facilities and to impose user fees as provided in this chapter shall apply to any portion of a transportation facility, whether constructed prior to, or on or after, October 1, 2016.

The eligible private entity may own, lease, or acquire any other right to use or develop and operate the qualifying transportation facility.

Any financing of the qualifying transportation facility may be in such amounts and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the eligible private entity; provided, that the eligible private entity may issue debt, equity, or other securities or obligations, enter into sale and leaseback transactions, and secure any financing with a pledge of, security interest in, or lien on, any or all of its property.

In developing, redeveloping, or operating the qualifying transportation facility, the eligible private entity may:

Make classifications according to reasonable categories for assessment of user fees in accordance with § 54-6-108(c); and

With the consent of the responsible public entity, make and enforce reasonable policies to the same extent that the responsible public entity could have made policies with respect to a similar transportation facility.

The eligible private entity shall:

Develop, redevelop, or operate the qualifying transportation facility in a manner that meets the engineering and other standards of the responsible public entity for transportation facilities operated and maintained by the responsible public entity, in accordance with the comprehensive agreement;

Keep the qualifying transportation facility open for use by the members of the public at all times after its initial opening upon payment of the applicable user fees and availability payments; provided, that the qualifying transportation facility may have reasonable hours of operation based on demand, and may be temporarily closed because of emergencies or, with the consent of the responsible public entity, to protect the safety of the public or for reasonable construction or maintenance procedures;

Maintain, or provide by contract for the maintenance of, the qualifying transportation facility;

File with the responsible public entity:

Reports describing material contracts with affiliates of the eligible private entity;

An accurate schedule of applicable user fees and availability payments charged for use of the qualifying transportation facility; and

Any other information required by the responsible public entity; and

Cooperate with the responsible public entity in establishing any interconnection with the qualifying transportation facility requested by the responsible public entity.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-114. Federal, state, or local assistance—Grants, milestone payments, or loans.

The responsible public entity may take any action to obtain federal, state, or local assistance for a qualifying transportation facility that serves the public purpose of this chapter and may enter into any contracts required to receive such federal, state, or local assistance; provided, that any federal funds available to or received by the state and other state funds for the purposes of this chapter shall be subject to appropriation by the general assembly in accordance with § 54-6-113(a). The responsible public entity may determine that it serves the public purpose of this chapter for all or any portion of the costs of a qualifying transportation facility to be paid, directly or indirectly, from the proceeds of a grant or loan made by the federal, state, or local government.

The responsible public entity may agree to make grants, milestone payments, or loans for the development, redevelopment, or operation of the qualifying transportation facility from amounts received from the federal government or other public entity. Prior to adoption by the responsible public entity of any action authorizing such grants, milestone payments, or loans, the public entity shall submit a plan of financing to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee for approval. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee may request any additional information as may be required to properly review the proposed plan of financing. The comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee shall evaluate each plan of financing based on the plan's particular circumstances and shall approve the plan only if a determination is made that the repayment structure is in the public's interest.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-115. Termination of comprehensive agreement by public entity—Remedies.

The responsible public entity may terminate a comprehensive agreement for a qualifying transportation facility:

If a material default, as defined in the comprehensive agreement, in the performance of the eligible private entity's duties under the comprehensive agreement or under the service contract, if any, has occurred and is continuing;

If development, redevelopment, or operation of the qualifying transportation facility has not begun by the date established by the responsible public entity as such date has been extended;

For failure to provide reasonably adequate service and facilities at reasonable and uniform user fees as provided by this chapter; or

For failure to comply with any order of a court of record.

Prior to any termination of a comprehensive agreement, the responsible public entity shall give written notice to the eligible private entity and any person providing financing for the qualifying transportation facility, including any trustee or agent for any person providing financing. The eligible private entity and the persons providing financing for the qualifying transportation facility shall be entitled to a reasonable time period to cure the event that could lead to termination of the comprehensive agreement.

Upon the termination of the comprehensive agreement, the responsible public entity may exercise any or all of the following remedies:

The responsible public entity may elect to take over the transportation facility and in such case it shall succeed to all of the right, title, and interest in such transportation facility, subject to any liens on revenues previously granted by the eligible private entity to any person providing financing therefor and subject to subsection (d). Any liens on the real estate and tangible property comprising the transportation facility or facilities shall be deemed to be extinguished and shall be released on request if the responsible public entity takes over the qualifying transportation facility pursuant to this subsection (c);

Any responsible public entity having the power of condemnation under applicable eminent domain law may exercise such power of condemnation to acquire the qualifying transportation facility. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the exercise of the power of condemnation by eminent domain by any responsible public entity against a qualifying transportation facility after termination of the comprehensive agreement. Any person that has provided financing for the qualifying transportation facility, and the eligible private entity, to the extent of the person's capital investment, may be entitled to certain compensation as set forth in the comprehensive agreement; or

The responsible public entity may exercise all other rights and remedies which may be available to it at law or in equity.

In the event the responsible public entity elects to take over a qualifying transportation facility pursuant to subdivision (c)(1), the responsible public entity may develop, redevelop, or operate the transportation facility, impose user fees for the use of the transportation facility, and comply with any service contracts as if it were the eligible private entity. Any revenues that are subject to a lien shall be collected for the benefit of, and paid to, secured parties, as their interests may appear, to the extent necessary to satisfy the eligible private entity's obligations to secured parties, including the maintenance of reserves, and such liens shall be correspondingly reduced and, when paid off, released. Before applying such payments to or for the benefit of secured parties, the responsible public entity may use revenues to pay current development, redevelopment, and operation costs of the transportation facility, including compensation to the responsible public entity for its services in operating and maintaining the qualifying transportation facility. Remaining revenues, if any, after all such payments have been made shall be paid to the eligible private entity over the time period that the comprehensive agreement would have been in effect had it not been terminated. The right to receive such payment, if any, shall be considered just compensation for the transportation facility or facilities.

The full faith and credit and unlimited taxing power of the responsible public entity shall not be pledged to secure any financing of the eligible private entity by the election to take over the qualifying transportation facility. Assumption of development, redevelopment, or operation of the qualifying transportation facility shall not obligate the responsible public entity to pay any obligation of the eligible private entity from sources other than revenues.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-116. Power of condemnation by eminent domain.

At the request of the eligible private entity, the responsible public entity may exercise any power of condemnation by eminent domain that it has under law for the purpose of acquiring any lands or estates or interests therein to the extent that the responsible public entity finds that such action serves the public purpose of this chapter. Any amounts to be paid in any such condemnation proceeding may be paid by the eligible private entity.

Except as provided in subsection (a), until a comprehensive agreement has been terminated, the power of condemnation may not be exercised against a qualifying transportation facility.

After the comprehensive agreement has been terminated, any responsible public entity having the power of condemnation under law may exercise such power of condemnation as provided by law.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-117. Crossing or relocation of facilities.

The eligible private entity and each public utility or other entity whose facilities are to be crossed or affected shall cooperate fully with the other in planning and arranging the manner of the crossing or relocation of the facilities. Any such entity possessing the power of condemnation is expressly granted such powers in connection with the moving or relocation of facilities to be crossed by the qualifying transportation facility or that must be relocated to the extent that such moving or relocation is made necessary or desirable by development, redevelopment, or operation of the qualifying transportation facility, which shall be construed to include development, redevelopment, or operation of temporary facilities for the purpose of providing service during the period of development, redevelopment, or operation. Should the eligible private entity and any such public utility or other entity not be able to agree upon a plan for the crossing or relocation, the responsible public entity may determine the manner in which the crossing or relocation is to be accomplished and any damages due arising out of the crossing or relocation. The responsible public entity may employ expert engineers who shall examine the location and plans for such crossing or relocation, hear any objections and consider modifications, and make a recommendation to the responsible public entity. In such a case, the cost of the experts is to be borne by the eligible private entity.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-118. Powers and jurisdiction of law enforcement officers — Access to transportation facility.

All law enforcement officers of the state and of each affected jurisdiction, shall have the same powers and jurisdiction within the limits of the qualifying transportation facility as are authorized in such respective areas of jurisdiction and such law enforcement officers shall have access to the qualifying transportation facility at any time for the purpose of exercising such powers and jurisdiction. This authority does not extend to the private offices, buildings, garages, and other improvements of the eligible private entity to any greater degree than the police power extends to any other private buildings and improvements.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-119. Termination dates of original permanent financing and comprehensive agreement.

The responsible public entity shall determine the date of termination of the original permanent financing and the comprehensive agreement. The responsible public entity may change or extend the termination dates to take into account any refinancing of the original permanent financing, including any refinancing for the purpose of expansion, or any early termination of the original permanent financing to the extent that such modification serves the public purpose of this chapter. Upon the termination of the comprehensive agreement, the authority and duties of the eligible private entity under this chapter shall cease, and the qualifying transportation facility shall be dedicated to the responsible public entity or, if the qualifying transportation facility was initially dedicated by an affected jurisdiction, to such affected jurisdiction for public use. Upon termination of the financing or comprehensive agreement, the responsible public entity may select another private entity pursuant to this chapter to provide the financing or complete the development, redevelopment, or operation of the qualifying transportation facility.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-120. Sovereign immunity not waived.

Nothing in this chapter constitutes a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state or any other public entity with respect to the participation in, or approval of all or any part of the qualifying transportation facility or its operation, including interconnection of the qualifying transportation facility with any other transportation facility.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.

54-6-121. Effect on other laws.

Nothing in this chapter amends or repeals in any manner this title or other provisions of law relating to the development, redevelopment, or operation of transportation facilities, or title 6 or title 12, chapter 3, or other provisions of law relating to procurement of goods and services by the state or other public entity.

This chapter supplements title 6 and title 12, chapter 3, and this title, to provide additional authority to procure and undertake the development, redevelopment, or operation of transportation facilities.

Except as provided in § 54-6-113(a), nothing in title 6 or title 12, chapter 3, or this title, shall apply to the development, redevelopment, or operation of qualifying transportation facilities undertaken pursuant to the authority of this chapter.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 1 enacted a new chapter 23, but the chapter has been redesignated as chapter 6, by authority of the Code Commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 2 provided that the commissioner of transportation is authorized to promulgate rules to effectuate the purposes of this act. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 975, § 4. October 1, 2016; provided that for the purpose of promulgating rules, the act took effect on April 27, 2016.